test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-bahtet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - båhtet: # Verb 'come'
     båhtet+V+Inf: båhtet
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bådáv
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bådá
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: båhtá
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: buhtin
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: [båhtebehtin, båhtebähtten]
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [båhteba, båhteban]
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: båhtep
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [båhtebehtit, båhtebähttet]
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: buhti

     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: buhtiv
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: buhti
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: budij
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: budijmen
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: budijden
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [budijga, budijgan]
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: budijme
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: budijde
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: buhtin

     båhtet+V+Imprt+Sg2: både  
     båhtet+V+Imprt+Du2: båhten
     båhtet+V+Imprt+Pl2: buhtit

#     båhtet+V+Pot+Sg1: buditjav
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Sg2: buditja
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Sg3: buditj
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Du1: buditjin
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Du2: [buditjähppen, buditjehpin]
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Du3: buditjiebá
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Pl1: buditjip
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Pl2: buditjihpit
#     båhtet+V+Pot+Pl3: buditji

     båhtet+V+ConNeg: både 
     båhtet+V+GerI: bådedin 
#     båhtet+V+Sup: bådátjit
#     båhtet+V+Vabe: båhtek  
     båhtet+V+Vgen: både 
     båhtet+V+GerII: båhtemin
     båhtet+V+PrfPrc: båhtám
#     båhtet+V+PrsPrc: båhtte 
#     båhtet+V+Vsubst: båhtem
